Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Cross references.

Right of appeal from confession of judgment, §

9-12-18

.

Appeals from decisions of judge of superior court in cases involving acquisition of property by state, counties, and municipalities for public road construction and other transportation purposes, §

32-3-14

et seq.

Judicial review and subsequent appeal of decisions of administrative bodies, §§

50-13-19

,

50-13-20

.

Requirement of expeditious determination of actions and appeals involving challenges to public improvements, projects, or facilities, §

50-15-3

.

Law reviews.

For article discussing developments in Georgia criminal law in 1976 to 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (1977).